Louisiana, session 2026, SB71.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. The secretary of the Department of Transportation and Development,
notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, is hereby authorized and
empowered to convey, transfer, assign, lease, or deliver any interest, excluding mineral
rights, the state may have to all or any portion of the following described parcels of
property to the Lafayette Public Trust Financing Authority:
Two (2) certain tract(s) or parcel(s) of land, together with all the
improvements situated thereon, and all of the rights, ways, privileges,
servitudes and advantages thereunto belonging or in anywise
appertaining, situated in Section(s) 67, Township 9 South, Range 4 East,
Southwestern Land District, Lafayette Parish, Louisiana, identified as
PARCEL NO(S). ADV-19-A-P1 and ADV-19-C-P1 as shown on Sheet
No(s). 1 of the property map for STATE PROJECT NO. 455-01-0034,
F.A. P. NO. 0009(803), I-10 CONNECTOR (LAFAYETTE), ROUTE I-
Page 1 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 71 ENROLLED
49, LAFAYETTE PARISH, prepared by Kenneth Fontenot, professional
land surveyor, dated August 13, 2007, and revised 1/26/09, said map
being attached hereto and made a part hereof, which property is more
particularly described as follows:
PARCEL NO. ADV-19-A-P1
BEGINNING at the southeasterly property corner of Coburn Supply
Company, Inc., and being the northwesterly intersection of Third Street
and West Grant Street, said corner having coordinates of X =
3,065,444.18 ft. and Y = 629,279.83 ft; THENCE South 65° 14' 24" West
along the northerly right of way of Third Street for a distance of 125.00
feet to a corner having coordinates of X = 3,065,330.67 ft. and Y =
629,227.48 ft; THENCE North 24° 45' 36" West for a distance of 200.00
feet to a corner having coordinates of X = 3,065,246.91 ft. and Y =
629,409.09 ft.; THENCE North 65° 14' 24" East for a distance of 125.00
feet to a corner on the westerly right of way of West Grant Street having
coordinates of X = 3,065,360.42 ft. and Y = 629,461.44 ft; THENCE
South 24° 45' 36" East along the westerly right of way of West Grant
Street for a distance of 200.00 feet to the POINT OF BEGINNING, all
containing 0.547 acre, and being more fully described as ADV-19-A-P1
on a map of survey titled "Right of Way Map, State Project No. 455-01-
0034, F.A.P. No. 0009(803), I-10 Connector (Lafayette), Lafayette Parish,
I-49", prepared by Professional Engineering and Surveying Company,
Inc., dated 08/13/07, revised 01/26/09.
PARCEL NO. ADV-19-C-P1
BEGINNING at the southwesterly property corner of Coburn Supply
Company of Lafayette, Inc. and being the northeasterly intersection of
Cypress Street and Third Street, said corner having coordinates of
X=3,065,171.76 ft. and Y=629,154.19 ft.; THENCE North 24° 45' 36"
West along the easterly right of way of Cypress Street for a distance of
216.81 feet to a corner having coordinates of X=3,065,080.96 ft. and
Page 2 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 71 ENROLLED
Y=629,351.06 ft.; THENCE North 26° 32' 55" East for a distance of
93.08 feet to a corner on the southerly right of way of Second Street
having coordinates of X=3,065,122.56 ft. and Y=629,434.33 ft.; THENCE
North 65° 14' 08" East along the southerly right of way of Second Street
for a distance of 77.35 feet to a corner having coordinates of
X=3,065,192.80 ft. and Y=629,466.73 ft.; THENCE South 24° 45' 36"
East for a distance of 187.00 feet to a corner having coordinates of
X=3,065,271.12 ft. and Y=629,296.92 ft.; THENCE South 65° 14' 11"
West for a distance of 54.20 feet to a corner having coordinates of
X=3,065,221.90 ft. and Y=629,274.21 ft.; THENCE South 24° 14' 20"
East for a distance of 88.00 feet to a corner on the northerly right of way
of Third Street having coordinates of X=3,065,258.03 ft. and
Y=629,193.97 ft.; THENCE South 65° 14' 24" West along the northerly
right of way of Third Street for a distance of 95.00 feet to the POINT OF
BEGINNING, all containing 0.78 acre, and being more fully described
as ADV-19-C-P1 on a map of survey titled "Right of Way Map, State
Project No. 455-01-0034, F.A.P. No. 0009(803), I-10 Connector
(Lafayette), Lafayette Parish, I-49", prepared by Kenneth Fontenot,
professional land surveyor, dated 08/13/07.
AND
One (1) certain tract or parcel of land, together with all the
improvements situated thereon, and all of the rights, ways, privileges,
servitudes and advantages thereunto belonging or in anywise
appertaining, situated in Section 67, Township 09 South, Range 04 East,
Southwest Land District, Lafayette Parish, Louisiana, identified as
PARCEL NO. ADV-13-P1 as shown on Sheet No. 1, on the property map
for STATE PROJECT NO. 455-01-0034, F. A. P. NO. 0009(803),
LAFAYETTE CONNECTION, ROUTE l-49, LAFAYETTE PARISH,
LOUISIANA, prepared by Kenneth Fontenot, professional land
surveyor, dated November 15, 2006, said map being attached hereto and
Page 3 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 71 ENROLLED
made a part hereto which property is more particularly described as
follows:
PARCEL NO. ADV-13-P1
Those two (2) certain lots of ground, together with all improvements
thereon and thereunto belonging, situated in the McComb Addition to
the City of Lafayette, Louisiana, and according to a map of said
Addition on file in the office of the Clerk of Court and ex officio recorder
for said Parish, are known and designated as Lots Nos. One and Two (1
and 2) of Square 16 of said Addition, each of said lots having a front of
twenty-five (25) feet on Grant Avenue by a depth in parallel lines of one
hundred twenty-five (125) feet; and together are bounded on the North
of Grant Avenue, on the South by an alley, on the East by Lot No. Three
(3) of said Square 16, and on the West by Second Street.
Also that certain lot of ground together with all improvements thereon
and thereunto belonging, situated in the McComb Addition to the City
of Lafayette, Louisiana, and according to a map of said Addition on tile
in the Clerk's office of the Parish of Lafayette, is known and designated
as Lot No. Three (3) of Block Sixteen (16) thereof; measuring twenty-five
(25) feet by a depth in parallel lines of one hundred and twenty-five (125)
feet, and being bounded on the North by Lot One (1); South by lot four
(4); East by Grant Avenue; and West by an alley.
Section 2. The secretary of the Department of Transportation and Development
is hereby authorized to enter into such agreements, covenants, conditions, and
stipulations and to execute such documents as necessary to properly effectuate any
conveyance, transfer, assignment, lease, or delivery of title, excluding mineral rights,
to the property described in Section 1 of this Act, and as more specifically described in
any such agreements entered into and documents executed by and between the
secretary of the Department of Transportation and Development and the Lafayette
Public Trust Financing Authority, in exchange of consideration proportionate to the
appraised value of the property.
Page 4 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 71 ENROLLED
Section 3. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 5 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.